en: Chair Accessories
xx: Chair Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k židlím
da: Tilbehør til stole
de: Stuhlzubehör
es: Accesorios para sillas
fr: Accessoires pour fauteuils
it: Accessori per sedie
ja: 椅子関連用品
nl: Stoelaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til stoler
pl: Akcesoria do krzeseł
pt: Acessórios para cadeiras
ru: Принадлежности для стульев
sv: Stolstillbehör
tr: Koltuk Aksesuarları

en: Hanging Chair Replacement Parts
xx: Hanging Chair Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly k závěsným křeslům
da: Reservedele til stole til ophængning
de: Ersatzteile für Hängesessel
es: Piezas de repuesto para sillas colgantes
fr: Pièces de rechange pour fauteuils suspendus
it: Parti ricambio per sedie sospese
ja: ハンギングチェア用交換パーツ
nl: Vervangende onderdelen voor ophangstoelen
no: Reservedeler til hengestoler
pl: Części zapasowe do krzeseł wiszących
pt: Peças de reposição para cadeiras suspensas
ru: Запасные части для подвесных кресел
sv: Ersättningsdelar till hängstolar
tr: Asma Koltuk Yedek Parçaları

en: Chairs
xx: Chairs
cs: Židle
da: Stole
de: Stühle
es: Sillas
fr: Fauteuils
it: Sedie
ja: 椅子
nl: Stoelen
no: Stoler
pl: Krzesła i fotele
pt: Cadeiras
ru: Кресла и стулья
sv: Stolar
tr: Sandalyeler

en: Wooden chair
fr: Chaise en bois

en: Arm Chairs\, Recliners & Sleeper Chairs
xx: Arm Chairs\, Recliners & Sleeper Chairs
cs: Křesílka\, polohovací křesla a rozkládací křesla
da: Lænestole\, liggestole og sovestole
de: Sessel
es: Sillones\, sillones reclinables y sillones extensibles
fr: Fauteuils club\, fauteuils inclinables et chauffeuses lits
it: Poltrone\, sedie con schienale reclinabile e poltrone reclinabili
ja: 肘掛け椅子・リクライニングチェア
nl: Armstoelen\, relaxstoelen en slaapbanken
no: Lenestoler\, liggestoler og sovestoler
pl: Fotele\, leżanki i fotele rozkładane
pt: Poltronas\, cadeiras reclináveis e poltronas-cama
ru: Кресла\, реклайнеры и кресла-кровати
sv: Fåtöljer\, vilstolar och sovfåtöljer
tr: Tekli Koltuklar\, Yatar Koltuklar ve Yatak Olabilen Koltuklar

en: Bean Bag Chairs
xx: Bean Bag Chairs
cs: Sedací vaky a pytle
da: Sækkestole
de: Sitzsäcke
es: Pufs
fr: Poufs poires
it: Poltrone a sacco
ja: ビーンバッグ
nl: Zitzakken
no: Saccosekker
pl: Worki do siedzenia
pt: Pufes redondos
ru: Кресла-мешки
sv: Sittsäckar
tr: Armut Koltuklar

en: Chaises
xx: Chaises
cs: Lenošky
da: Chaisselonger
de: Liegemöbel
es: Divanes
fr: Chaises longues, Bain de soleil, Transat
it: Chaise
ja: シェーズロング
nl: Leunstoelen
no: Sjeselonger
pl: Szezlongi
pt: Cadeira espreguiçadeira
ru: Шезлонги
sv: Schäser
tr: Uzanma Koltukları

en: Electric Massaging Chairs
xx: Electric Massaging Chairs
cs: Elektrická masážní křesla
da: Elektriske massagestole
de: Elektrische Massagesessel
es: Sillones de masaje eléctricos
fr: Fauteuils de massage électriques
it: Poltrone massaggianti
ja: 電動マッサージチェア
nl: Elektrische massagestoelen
no: Elektriske massasjestoler
pl: Fotele masujące
pt: Cadeiras de massagem elétricas
ru: Кресла с электромассажем
sv: Elektriska massagestolar
tr: Elektrikli Masaj Koltukları

en: Floor Chairs
xx: Floor Chairs
cs: Podlahová křesla
da: Gulvstole
de: Bodenstühle
es: Sillas de suelo
fr: Fauteuils de sol
it: Sedie da pavimento
ja: 座椅子
nl: Vloerstoelen
no: Gulvstoler
pl: Krzesła bez nóg
pt: Cadeiras de chão
ru: Напольные кресла
sv: Stolar utan ben
tr: Yer Sandalyeleri

en: Folding Chairs & Stools
xx: Folding Chairs & Stools
cs: Skládací židle a stolky
da: Klapstole
de: Klappstühle & Holzhocker
es: Taburetes y sillas plegables
fr: Chaises pliantes et tabourets pliants
it: Sedie e sgabelli pieghevoli
ja: 折りたたみ椅子
nl: Klapstoelen
no: Sammenleggbare stoler og krakker
pl: Składane krzesła i stołki
pt: Cadeiras e bancos dobráveis
ru: Складные стулья и табуретки
sv: Fällstolar och -pallar
tr: Katlanır Sandalye ve Tabureler

en: Gaming Chairs
xx: Gaming Chairs
cs: Hrací křesla
da: Spillestole
de: Multimediasessel
es: Sillones para videojuegos
fr: Fauteuils de jeux
it: Sedie da gioco
ja: ゲーム用椅子
nl: Gamestoelen
no: Spillestoler
pl: Fotele do grania
pt: Cadeiras de jogo
ru: Игровые кресла
sv: Spelstolar
tr: Oyun Koltukları

en: Hanging Chairs
xx: Hanging Chairs
cs: Závěsná křesla
da: Hængestole
de: Hängesessel
es: Sillas colgantes
fr: Fauteuils suspendus
it: Sedie sospese
ja: ハンギングチェア
nl: Ophangstoelen
no: Hengestoler
pl: Krzesła wiszące
pt: Cadeiras suspensas
ru: Подвесные кресла
sv: Hängstolar
tr: Asılı Koltuklar

en: Kitchen & Dining Room Chairs
xx: Kitchen & Dining Room Chairs
cs: Kuchyňské a jídelní židle
da: Køkken- og spisestuestole
de: Küchen- und Esszimmerstühle
es: Sillas para salón comedor y cocina
fr: Chaises de cuisine et de salle à manger, Chaise
it: Sedie per cucina e sala da pranzo
ja: ダイニングチェア
nl: Keuken- en eetkamerstoelen
no: Kjøkken- og spisestuestoler
pl: Krzesła do kuchni i jadalni
pt: Cadeiras de cozinha e sala de jantar
ru: Кухонные и столовые стулья
sv: Köks- och vardagsrumsstolar
tr: Mutfak ve Yemek Odası Sandalyeleri

en: Rocking Chairs
xx: Rocking Chairs
cs: Houpací židle
da: Gyngestole
de: Schaukelstühle
es: Mecedoras
fr: Fauteuils à bascule
it: Sedie a dondolo
ja: ロッキングチェア
nl: Schommelstoelen
no: Gyngestoler
pl: Fotele bujane
pt: Cadeiras de balanço
ru: Кресла-качалки
sv: Gungstolar
tr: Sallanan Sandalyeler

en: Slipper Chairs
xx: Slipper Chairs
cs: Nízké polštářové židle
da: Polstrede stole
de: Sessel ohne Armlehnen
es: Sillas poltrona
fr: Chauffeuses
it: Poltrone letto
ja: ラウンジチェア
nl: Slipper chairs
no: Slipper-stoler
pl: Fotele bez podłokietników
pt: Poltronas
ru: Каминные кресла
sv: Låga fåtöljer
tr: Tekli Kolsuz Kanepeler

en: Table & Bar Stools
xx: Table & Bar Stools
cs: Barové židle
da: Barstole
de: Hocker & Barhocker
es: Taburetes de bar
fr: Tabourets et chaises de bar
it: Sgabelli da bar e da tavolo
ja: バースツール
nl: Barkrukken
no: Bord- og barkrakker
pl: Stołki barowe
pt: Bancos altos para bares
ru: Барные стулья
sv: Barstolar
tr: Masa ve Bar Tabureleri

en: Entertainment Centers & TV Stands
xx: Entertainment Centers & TV Stands
cs: Zábavní a multimediální centra
da: Borde til underholdningscentre og tv
de: Möbel für Unterhaltungselektronik
es: Centros de entretenimiento y multimedia
fr: Meubles audio/vidéo et pour home cinéma, Meuble TV
it: Postazioni multimediali e svago
ja: テレビ台・オーディオラック
nl: Entertainment- en mediasystemen
no: Underholdningssentre og TV-bord
pl: Meble RTV
pt: Centros de entretenimento e mídia
ru: Стойки для телевизоров и аппаратуры
sv: Hemmabiomöbler och TV-bänkar
tr: Eğlence Merkezleri ve TV Sehpaları

en: Furniture Sets
xx: Furniture Sets
cs: Sady nábytku
da: Møbelsæt
de: Möbelgarnituren
es: Conjuntos de mobiliario
fr: Ensembles de meubles
it: Set di mobili
ja: 家具セット
nl: Meubelsets
no: Møbelsett
pl: Zestawy mebli
pt: Conjuntos de móveis
ru: Наборы мебели
sv: Möbelset
tr: Mobilya Takımları

en: Bathroom Furniture Sets
xx: Bathroom Furniture Sets
cs: Sady koupelnového nábytku
da: Badeværelsesmøbelsæt
de: Badezimmergarnituren
es: Muebles de baño
fr: Ensembles de mobilier pour salles de bains
it: Set di mobili per bagno
ja: 浴室家具セット
nl: Badkamermeubelsets
no: Baderomsmøbelsett
pl: Zestawy mebli łazienkowych
pt: Conjuntos de móveis para banheiro
ru: Комплекты мебели для ванной
sv: Badrumsinredningspaket
tr: Banyo Mobilya Setleri

en: Bedroom Furniture Sets
xx: Bedroom Furniture Sets
cs: Sady nábytku do ložnice
da: Møbelsæt til soveværelse
de: Schlafzimmergarnituren
es: Conjuntos de mobiliario para dormitorios
fr: Ensembles de meubles pour chambre
it: Set di mobili per camera da letto
ja: 寝室用家具セット
nl: Meubelsets voor slaapkamers
no: Soveromsmøbelsett
pl: Zestawy mebli do sypialni
pt: Conjuntos de móveis para quarto
ru: Наборы мебели для спальных комнат
sv: Möbelset för sovrum
tr: Yatak Odası Mobilya Takımları